Vermont, session 2025-2026, S90.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 495i is amended to read:
§ 495i. EMPLOYMENT BASED ON CREDIT INFORMATION;
PROHIBITIONS
* * *
(b) An employer shall not:
(1) fail or refuse to hire or recruit, discharge, or otherwise discriminate
against an individual with respect to employment; compensation; or a term,
VT LEG #379374 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.90
2025 Page 2 of 8
condition, or privilege of employment because of the individual’s credit report
or credit history; or
(2) inquire about an applicant’s or employee’s credit report or credit
history.
(c)(1) An employer is exempt from the provisions of subsection (b) of this
section if one or more of the following conditions are met:
(A) The information is required by State or federal law or regulation.
(B) The position of employment involves access to confidential
financial information.
(C) The employer is a financial institution as defined in 8 V.S.A.
§ 11101(32) or a credit union as defined in 8 V.S.A. § 30101(5) and the
employer can demonstrate that the information has a direct relationship to the
job duties of the specific position of employment.
(D) The position of employment is that of a law enforcement officer
as defined in 20 V.S.A. § 2351a, emergency medical personnel as defined in
24 V.S.A. § 2651(6), or a firefighter as defined in 20 V.S.A. § 3151(3).
(E) The position of employment requires a financial fiduciary
responsibility to the employer or a client of the employer, including the
authority to issue payments, collect debts, transfer money, or enter into
contracts.
VT LEG #379374 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.90
2025 Page 3 of 8
(F) The employer can demonstrate that the information is a valid and
reliable predictor of employee performance in the specific position of
employment and has a direct relationship to the job duties of the specific
position of employment.
(G) The position of employment involves access to an employer’s
payroll information and the employer can demonstrate that the information has
a direct relationship to the job duties of the specific position of employment.
(2) An employer that is exempt from the provisions of subsection (b) of
this section may not use an employee’s or applicant’s credit report or history as
the sole factor in decisions regarding employment; compensation; or a term,
condition, or privilege of employment.
* * *
(e) An employer shall not discharge or in any other manner discriminate
against an employee or applicant who has filed a complaint of unlawful
employment practices in violation of this section or who has cooperated with
the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney in an investigation of such practices
or who is about to lodge a complaint or cooperate in an investigation or
because the employer believes that the employee or applicant may lodge a
complaint or cooperate in an investigation The provisions against retaliation in
subdivision 495(a)(8) of this subchapter shall apply to this section.
* * *
VT LEG #379374 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.90
2025 Page 4 of 8
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 495j is amended to read:
§ 495j. CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS; EMPLOYMENT
APPLICATIONS
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an employer shall
not request criminal history record information on its initial employee
application form nor inquire about an applicant’s criminal history during a job
interview. An employer may only inquire about a prospective employee’s
criminal history record during an interview or convictions or recent arrests that
have not yet been judicially adjudicated under this subsection once the
prospective employee has been deemed otherwise qualified for the position
receives a conditional offer of employment and the inquiry has a direct
relationship to the job duties of the specific position. If the information
provided has a direct relationship to the job duties of the specific position, the
employer may withdraw the conditional offer of employment. In considering
whether the provided information has a direct relationship to the job duties of
the specific position, the employer shall consider:
(1) the job duties of the specific position;
(2) the nature and gravity of the offense;
(3) the passage of time since the offense occurred or the prospective
employee completed a prison sentence;
VT LEG #379374 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.90
2025 Page 5 of 8
(4) the age of the prospective employee at the time the offense occurred;
and
(5) the legitimate interest of the employer in protecting the property and
safety and welfare of specific individuals or the general public.
(b)(1) An employer may inquire about criminal convictions on an initial
employee application form if the following conditions are met:
(A)(i) the prospective employee is applying for a position for which
any federal or State law or regulation creates a mandatory or presumptive
disqualification based on a conviction for one or more types of criminal
offenses; or
(ii) the employer or an affiliate of the employer is subject to an
obligation imposed by any federal or State law or regulation not to employ an
individual, in either one or more positions, who has been convicted of one or
more types of criminal offenses; and
(B) the questions on the application form are limited to the types of
criminal offenses creating the disqualification or obligation.
* * *
(c) If an employer inquires about a prospective employee’s criminal history
record information, the prospective employee, if still eligible for the position
under applicable federal or State law, must be afforded an opportunity to
VT LEG #379374 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.90
2025 Page 6 of 8
explain the information and the circumstances regarding any convictions,
including postconviction rehabilitation.
(d) An employer who violates the provisions of this section shall be
assessed a civil penalty of up to $100.00 $1,000.00 for each violation.
(e) As used in this section:
(1) “Criminal history record” has the same meaning as set forth in 20
V.S.A. § 2056a. [Repealed.]
(2) “Employee” has the same meaning as set forth in section 495d of
this chapter.
(3) “Employer” has the same meaning as set forth in section 495d of this
chapter.
Sec. 3. 21 V.S.A. § 512 is amended to read:
§ 512. DRUG TESTING OF APPLICANTS; PROHIBITIONS;
EXCEPTIONS
* * *
(b) Exception. An employer may require an applicant for employment to
submit to a drug test only if all of the following conditions are met:
(1) Conditional offer of employment. The applicant has been given an
offer of employment conditioned on the applicant receiving a negative test
result.
VT LEG #379374 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.90
2025 Page 7 of 8
(2) Notice. The applicant received written notice of the drug testing
procedure and a list of the drugs to be tested. The notice shall also state that a
positive test for therapeutic levels of medically prescribed drugs tested,
including cannabis for symptom relief, will not be reported. The notice
required under this subdivision may shall not be waived by the applicant.
(3) Administration. The drug test is administered in accordance with
section 514 of this title.
(4) Relationship to job duties. Information relating to the applicant’s
possible use of drugs has a direct relationship to the applicant’s ability to
perform the job duties of the specific position that has been offered.
Sec. 4. 21 V.S.A. § 513 is amended to read:
§ 513. DRUG TESTING OF EMPLOYEES; PROHIBITIONS;
EXCEPTIONS
* * *
(c) Exception. Notwithstanding the prohibition in subsection (a) of this
section, an employer may require an individual employee to submit to a drug
test if all the following conditions are met:
(1) Probable cause. The employer or an agent of the employer has
probable cause to believe the employee is using or is under the influence of a
drug on the job.
VT LEG #379374 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.90
2025 Page 8 of 8
(2) Employee assistance program. The employer has available for the
employee tested a bona fide rehabilitation program for alcohol or drug abuse
and such program is provided by the employer or is available to the extent
provided by a policy of health insurance or under contract by a nonprofit
hospital service corporation.
(3) Employee may not be terminated. The employee may shall not be
terminated if the test result is positive and the employee agrees to participate in
and then successfully completes the employee assistance program; however,
the employee may be suspended only for the period of time necessary to
complete the program, but in no event longer than three months. The
employee may be terminated if, after completion of an employee assistance
program, the employer subsequently administers a drug test in compliance with
subdivisions (1) and, (4), and (5) of this subsection and the test result is
positive.
(4) Administration of test. The drug test is administered in accordance
with section 514 of this title.
(5) Relationship to job duties. Information relating to whether the
employee is using or is under the influence of a drug on the job has a direct
relationship to the employee’s ability to perform the employee’s job duties.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379374 v.1